Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.070

Influencing outcome of sporting event.

Whoever knowingly gives, promises, or offers to any professional or amateur baseball, football, hockey, polo, tennis, horse race, or basketball player or boxer or any player or referee or other official who participates or expects to participate in any professional or amateur game or sport, or to any manager, coach, or trainer of any team or participant or prospective participant in any such game, contest, or sport, any benefit with intent to influence the person to lose or try to lose or cause to be lost or to limit the person's or person's team's margin of victory or defeat, or in the case of a referee or other official to affect the decisions or the performance of the official's duties in any way, in a baseball, football, hockey, or basketball game, boxing, tennis, horse race, or polo match, or any professional or amateur sport or game, in which the player or participant or referee or other official is taking part or expects to take part, or has any duty or connection therewith, is guilty of a class C felony.

[ 2001 c 222 s 10. Prior: 1984 c 270 s 7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.